Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-927
Skatepark and bicycle motocross park; sign required; warning notice.

(1) A political subdivision shall post and maintain a sign at each skatepark and bicycle motocross park sponsored by the political subdivision containing the following warning notice: Under Nebraska law, a political subdivision is not liable for an injury to or the death of a participant in recreational activities resulting from the inherent risks of the recreational activities pursuant to section 13-910.

(2) The absence of a sign shall not give rise to liability on the part of the political subdivision.

Laws 2007, LB564, § 3.